Missouri, session 2026, HB1819.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 210, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 210.224, to read as follows:
210.224. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "Conrad's Law".
2. As used in this section, the term "special needs" means special physical,
developmental, or behavioral needs.
3. The department of elementary and secondary education shall establish the
following for any licensed child care facility:
(1) Training on and rules for nonrestrained safe sleep policies for children one
year of age or older and children with special needs. Such policies shall include safety
procedures for the use of a weighted blanket, except that no weighted blanket used in
the child care facility shall:
(a) Exceed five pounds; or
(b) Be used on any child under one year of age;
(2) Safe rest options for any nonnapping child. Such options shall include an
exception for nonrestrained quiet-play activities or other activities so long as the
activities are supervised; and
(3) A care plan for a child with special needs. Such care plan shall be reviewed,
agreed upon, signed, and annually reviewed by the child's parents or legal guardians,
the child care facility owner or director, the child's primary care provider, and any staff
member who is directly responsible for the care of the child.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1819 2
4. All licensed and registered child care facilities shall complete at least one hour
of training related to special needs care. If a child care facility is caring for a child with
special needs, all staff members who are directly responsible for the care of such child
shall receive training specific to the needs of a child with that diagnosis. Such training
may count toward the required annual training hours and shall be monitored by the
office of childhood within the department of elementary and secondary education as
part of the licensed child care provider hours of training.
5. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any child who is under one
year of age. Safe sleep policies for any child under one year of age shall be governed by
section 210.223.
✔